Illinois, session 104th, SB203.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Public Officer Prohibited Activities Act is 5amended by by changing Sections 1, 2, and 2a and by adding 6Section 1.4 as follows: 7    (50 ILCS 105/1)  (from Ch. 102, par. 1)8    Sec. 1. County board. Except as provided in Section 1.4, 9no No member of a county board, during the term of office for 10which he or she is elected, may be appointed to, accept, or 11hold any office other than (i) chairman of the county board or 12member of the regional planning commission by appointment or 13election of the board of which he or she is a member or , (ii) 14alderperson of a city or member of the board of trustees of a 15village or incorporated town if the city, village, or 16incorporated town has fewer than 1,000 inhabitants and is 17located in a county having fewer than 50,000 inhabitants, or 18(iii) trustee of a forest preserve district created under 19Section 18.5 of the Conservation District Act, unless he or 20she first resigns from the office of county board member or 21unless the holding of another office is authorized by law. Any 22such prohibited appointment or election is void. This Section 23shall not preclude a member of the county board from being   SB0203- 2 -LRB104 05146 RTM 15175 b1appointed or selected to serve as (i) a member of a County 2Extension Board as provided in Section 7 of the County 3Cooperative Extension Law, (ii) a member of an Emergency 4Telephone System Board as provided in Section 15.4 of the 5Emergency Telephone System Act, (iii) a member of the board of 6review as provided in Section 6-30 of the Property Tax Code, or 7(iv) a public administrator or public guardian as provided in 8Section 13-1 of the Probate Act of 1975. Nothing in this Act 9shall be construed to prohibit an elected county official from 10holding elected office in another unit of local government so 11long as there is no contractual relationship between the 12county and the other unit of local government. This amendatory 13Act of 1995 is declarative of existing law and is not a new 14enactment.15(Source: P.A. 102-15, eff. 6-17-21.) 16    (50 ILCS 105/1.4 new)17    Sec. 1.4. Simultaneous service. Notwithstanding any other 18provision of law, a resident of a county having fewer than 1950,000 inhabitants is not prohibited from serving 20simultaneously on the governing bodies of more than one State 21or local governmental unit. 22    (50 ILCS 105/2)  (from Ch. 102, par. 2)23    Sec. 2. Except as provided in Section 1.4, no No 24alderperson of any city, or member of the board of trustees of   SB0203- 3 -LRB104 05146 RTM 15175 b1any village, during the term of office for which he or she is 2elected, may accept, be appointed to, or hold any office by the 3appointment of the mayor or president of the board of 4trustees, unless the alderperson or board member is granted a 5leave of absence from such office, or unless he or she first 6resigns from the office of alderperson or member of the board 7of trustees, or unless the holding of another office is 8authorized by law. The alderperson or board member may, 9however, serve as a volunteer fireman and receive compensation 10for that service. The alderperson may also serve as a 11commissioner of the Beardstown Regional Flood Prevention 12District board. Any appointment in violation of this Section 13is void. Nothing in this Act shall be construed to prohibit an 14elected municipal official from holding elected office in 15another unit of local government as long as there is no 16contractual relationship between the municipality and the 17other unit of local government. This amendatory Act of 1995 is 18declarative of existing law and is not a new enactment.19(Source: P.A. 102-15, eff. 6-17-21.) 20    (50 ILCS 105/2a)  (from Ch. 102, par. 2a)21    Sec. 2a. Township officials. 22    (a) Except as provided in Section 1.4, no No township 23supervisor or trustee, during the term of office for which he 24or she is elected, may accept, be appointed to, or hold any 25office by the appointment of the board of township trustees   SB0203- 4 -LRB104 05146 RTM 15175 b1unless he or she first resigns from the office of supervisor or 2trustee or unless the appointment is specifically authorized 3by law. A supervisor or trustee may, however, serve as a 4volunteer firefighter and receive compensation for that 5service. Any appointment in violation of this Section is void. 6Nothing in this Act shall be construed to prohibit an elected 7township official from holding elected office in another unit 8of local government as long as there is no contractual 9relationship between the township and the other unit of local 10government. This amendatory Act of 1995 is declarative of 11existing law and is not a new enactment.12    (b) Except as provided in Section 1.4, On and after the 13effective date of this amendatory Act of the 100th General 14Assembly, a person elected to or appointed to fill a vacancy in 15an elected township position, including, but not limited to, a 16trustee, a supervisor, a highway commissioner, a clerk, an 17assessor, or a collector, shall not be employed by the 18township, except that a supervisor or trustee may serve as a 19volunteer firefighter and receive compensation for that 20service as provided in subsection (a). 21(Source: P.A. 100-868, eff. 1-1-19.)